Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 6552, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 6552. As used in the Hospital and Medical Services


Utilization Review Act:



Req. No. 2293 Page 1


1. “Utilization review” means a system for prospectively,


concurrently and retrospectively reviewing the appropriate and


efficient allocation of hospital resources and medical services


given or proposed to be given to a patient or group of patients. It


does not include an insurer’s normal claim review process to


determine compliance with the specific terms and conditions of the


insurance policy


“Artificial intelligence” means a computer system, program, or


set of algorithms capable of performing tasks on producing outposts


that imitate intelligent human behaviors;


2. “Private review agent” means a person or entity who performs


utilization review on behalf of:


a. an employer in this state, or


b. a third party that provides or administers hospital


and medical benefits to citizens of this state,


including, but not limited to:


(1) a health maintenance organization issued a


license pursuant to Section 2501 et seq. of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, unless the health


maintenance organization is federally regulated


and licensed and has on file with the Insurance


Commissioner a plan of utilization review carried


out by health care professionals and providing



Req. No. 2293 Page 2


for complaint and appellate procedures for


claims, or


(2) a health insurer, not-for-profit hospital service


or medical plan, health insurance service


organization, or preferred provider organization


or other entity offering health insurance


policies, contracts or benefits in this state


“Artificial intelligence tool” means a tool that uses an


artificial intelligence or algorithm for the purpose of utilization


review based in whole or in part on medical necessity;


3. “Utilization review plan” means a description of utilization


review procedures;


4. “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner;


5. 4. “Certificate” means a certificate of registration granted


by the Insurance Commissioner to a private review agent; and


6. 5. “Health care provider” means any person, firm,


corporation or other legal entity that is licensed, certified, or


otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to provide health


care services, procedures or supplies in the ordinary course of


business or practice of a profession;


6. “Private review agent” means a person or entity that


performs utilization review on behalf of:


a. an employer in this state, or



Req. No. 2293 Page 3


b. a third party that provides or administers hospital


and medical benefits to citizens of this state,


including, but not limited to:


(1) a health maintenance organization issued a


license pursuant to Section 6901 et seq. of this


title, unless the health maintenance organization


is federally regulated and licensed and has on


file with the Insurance Commissioner a plan of


utilization review carried out by health care


professionals and providing for complaint and


appellate procedures for claims, or


(2) a health insurer, not-for-profit hospital service


or medical plan, health insurance service


organization, or preferred provider organization


or other entity offering health insurance


policies, contracts or benefits in this state;


7. “Utilization review” means a system for prospectively,


concurrently, and retrospectively reviewing the allocation of


hospital resources and medical services given or proposed to be


given to a patient or group of patients. It does not include an


insurer’s normal claim review process to determine compliance with


the specific terms and conditions of the insurance policy;


8. “Utilization review plan” means a description of utilization


review procedures; and

Req. No. 2293 Page 4


9. “Utilization review organization” means the same as defined


in Section 6475.3 of this title.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6567 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A utilization review organization, disability insurer, or


specialized health insurer that uses an artificial intelligence tool


or contracts with or otherwise works through an entity that uses an


artificial intelligence tool shall ensure that the artificial


intelligence tool:


1. Bases its determination on the following information, as


applicable:


a. an enrollee’s medical or other clinical history,


b. individual clinical circumstances as presented by the


requesting provider, and


c. other relevant clinical information contained in the


enrollee’s medical or other clinical record;


2. Does not base its determination solely on a group dataset;


3. Does not supplant health care provider decision-making;


4. Does not discriminate against enrollees in violation of


state and federal law;


5. Does not use patient data beyond its intended and stated


purpose consistent with the federal Health Insurance Portability and


Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. No. 104-191, as applicable;

Req. No. 2293 Page 5


6. Does not cause harm to the enrollee;


7. Is applied in accordance with any applicable regulations and


guidance issued by the federal Department of Health and Human


Services;


8. Is open to inspection for audit or compliance review by the


Insurance Commissioner;


9. Contains disclosures pertaining to the use and oversight of


the artificial intelligence tool in the written policies and


procedures; and


10. Requires performance use and outcomes to be periodically


reviewed and revised to maximize accuracy and reliability.


B. The artificial intelligence tool shall not deny, delay, or


modify health care services based, in whole or in part, on medical


necessity. A determination of medical necessity shall be made only


by a licensed physician or a licensed health care professional


competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the


health care services requested by the provider, by reviewing and


considering the requesting provider’s recommendation, the enrollee’s


medical or other clinical history, and individual circumstances.


C. Any health benefit plan in this state shall notify enrollees


and insureds about the use or lack of use of artificial intelligence


tools in the utilization review process on the accessible Internet


website of such health benefit plan.



Req. No. 2293 Page 6


D. A clinical peer reviewer who participates in a utilization


review process for a health benefit plan that initially uses


artificial intelligence tools for a utilization review shall open


and document the utilization review of the individual clinical


records or data prior to issuing an adverse determination.


E. A violation of this act by a health benefit plan or clinical


peer reviewer shall be subject to one or more of the following


penalties, not to exceed in aggregate Five Hundred Thousand Dollars


($500,000.00) for a health benefit plan or One Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($100,000.00) for a clinical peer reviewer, in a calendar


year:


1. Suspension or revocation of a license;


2. Refusal, for a period not to exceed one (1) year, to issue a


new license; or


3. A fine not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for


each willful violation.


F. Penalties pursuant to this act shall be in addition to any


other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other


applicable state or federal law.


G. This act shall apply to utilization review or utilization


management functions that prospectively, concurrently,


retrospectively review requests for covered health care services.


H. The Commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations


pursuant to the provisions of this act.

Req. No. 2293 Page 7


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2293 CAD 1/15/2026 9:15:11 AM











































Req. No. 2293 Page 8